Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 9. Bear River Recreation Area and State Park

§ 36-8-901.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The section, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3, related to reservation of lands for, and description of, Bear River recreation area.

Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 36-8-902.
Designation of lands as Bear River state park; park administration and operation.

The lands in Uinta county managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and known as Bear River State Park are declared to be a state park. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the state park.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall administer and operate the state park created by this section.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 16, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1997, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2010, ch. 11, §§ 2, 3.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (a), deleting “state-owned” preceding “lands,” substituting “managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and known as Bear River State Park are declared to be a state park” for “described as follows are designated as the Bear River State Park,” deleting the statutory legal descriptions, and adding the last sentence; repealed former (b) and (c) pertaining to lease agreements and effective date of land commissioners transferring control of the administration and operation of the lands;
in (d), deleted “is the successor agency to the department of commerce and the Wyoming recreation commission and” following “cultural resources” and “in accordance with the plan specified in W.S. 36-8-901(e) unless otherwise directed by the legislature” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch 9 § 1, provides:

“(a) The board of land commissioners is authorized and directed to convey its right, title and interest in the following lands to the department of state parks and cultural resources:

“(i) In Township 15 North, Range 120 West, 6th P.M., Section 22: N1/2 SE1/4; SE1/4 SE1/4; that portion of S1/2 NE1/4 lying south of the Interstate 80 highway right-of-way; that portion of SW1/4 SE1/4 and E1/2 SW1/4 lying northeast of a line described as follows: beginning at a point on the south line of Section 22 which is 42.30 chains East of the Southwest corner of Section 22, then running North 21°15' West 11.20 chains to a point, and then running North 27° West 43.50 chains, more or less, to a point where the line intersects the west line of SE1/4 NW1/4 of Section 22; and that portion of SE1/4 NW1/4 lying northeast of the above described line and south of the Interstate 80 highway right-of-way; containing 280 acres, more or less.”